Idaho, session 2026, S1250.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 74-105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-105. RECORDS EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE -- LAW ENFORCEMENT RECORDS,
INVESTIGATORY RECORDS OF AGENCIES, EVACUATION AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLANS,
WORKER'S COMPENSATION. The following records are exempt from disclosure:
(1) Investigatory records of a law enforcement agency as defined in
section 74-101(7), Idaho Code, under the conditions set forth in section
74-124, Idaho Code.
(2) Juvenile records of a person maintained pursuant to chapter 5,
title 20, Idaho Code, except that facts contained in such records shall be
furnished upon request in a manner determined by the court to persons and
governmental and private agencies and institutions conducting pertinent
research studies or having a legitimate interest in the protection, welfare
and treatment of the juvenile who is thirteen (13) years of age or younger.
If the juvenile is petitioned or charged with an offense that would be a
criminal offense if committed by an adult, the name, offense of which the
juvenile was petitioned or charged, and disposition of the court shall be
subject to disclosure as provided in section 20-525, Idaho Code. Addi-
tionally, facts contained in any records of a juvenile maintained pursuant
to chapter 5, title 20, Idaho Code, shall be furnished upon request to any
school district where the juvenile is enrolled or is seeking enrollment.
(3) Records of the custody review board of the Idaho department of ju-
venile corrections, including records containing the names, addresses and
written statements of victims and family members of juveniles, shall be ex-
empt from public disclosure pursuant to section 20-533A, Idaho Code.
(4)(a) The following records of the department of correction:
(i) Records of which the public interest in confidentiality, pub-
lic safety, security and habilitation clearly outweighs the pub-
lic interest in disclosure as identified pursuant to the authority
of the state board of correction under section 20-212, Idaho Code;
(ii) Records that contain any identifying information or any in-
formation that would lead to the identification of any victims or
witnesses;
(iii) Records that reflect future transportation or movement of a
prisoner;


(iv) Records gathered during the course of the presentence inves-
tigation; and
(v) Records of a prisoner as defined in section 74-101(10), Idaho
Code, or probationer shall not be disclosed to any other prisoner
or probationer.
(b) Records, other than public expenditure records, related to pro-
posed or existing critical infrastructure held by or in the custody
of any public agency only when the disclosure of such information is
reasonably likely to jeopardize the safety of persons, property or the
public safety. Such records may include emergency evacuation, escape
or other emergency response plans, vulnerability assessments, oper-
ation and security manuals, plans, blueprints or security codes. For
purposes of this paragraph, "system" includes electrical, computer
and telecommunications systems, electric power (including produc-
tion, generating, transportation, transmission and distribution), and
heating, ventilation, and air conditioning. For purposes of this sub-
section, "critical infrastructure" means any system or asset, whether
physical or virtual, so vital to the state of Idaho, including its po-
litical subdivisions, that the incapacity or destruction of such system
or asset would have a debilitating impact on state or national economic
security, state or national public health or safety, or any combination
of those matters.
(c) Records of the Idaho commission of pardons and parole shall be ex-
empt from public disclosure pursuant to sections 20-1003 and 20-1005,
Idaho Code. Records exempt from disclosure shall also include those
containing the names, addresses and written statements of victims.
(5) Voting records of the former sexual offender classification board.
The written record of the vote to classify an offender as a violent sexual
predator by each board member in each case reviewed by that board member
shall be exempt from disclosure to the public and shall be made available
upon request only to the governor, the chairman of the senate judiciary and
rules committee, and the chairman of the house of representatives judiciary,
rules and administration committee for all lawful purposes.
(6) Records of the sheriff or Idaho state police received or maintained
pursuant to sections 18-3302, 18-3302H and 18-3302K, Idaho Code, relating
to an applicant or licensee, except that any law enforcement officer and law
enforcement agency, whether inside or outside the state of Idaho, may access
information maintained in the license record system as set forth in section
18-3302K(16), Idaho Code.
(7) Records of investigations prepared by the department of health and
welfare pursuant to its statutory responsibilities dealing with the protec-
tion of children, the rehabilitation of youth, adoptions and the commitment
of mentally ill persons. For reasons of health and safety, best interests of
the child or public interest, the department of health and welfare may pro-
vide for the disclosure of records of investigations associated with actions
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code, prepared by
the department of health and welfare pursuant to its statutory responsibil-
ities dealing with the protection of children, except any such records re-
garding adoptions shall remain exempt from disclosure.


(8) Records, including but not limited to investigative reports, re-
sulting from investigations conducted into complaints of discrimination
made to the Idaho human rights commission, unless the public interest in
allowing inspection and copying of such records outweighs the legitimate
public or private interest in maintaining confidentiality of such records.
A person may inspect and copy documents from an investigative file to which
he or she is a named party if such documents are not otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by federal law or regulation or state law. The confidentiality of
this subsection will no longer apply to any record used in any judicial pro-
ceeding brought by a named party to the complaint or investigation, or by the
Idaho human rights commission, relating to the complaint of discrimination.
(9) Records containing information obtained by the manager of the Idaho
state insurance fund pursuant to chapter 9, title 72, Idaho Code, from or on
behalf of employers or employees contained in underwriting and claims for
benefits files.
(10) The worker's compensation records of the Idaho industrial commis-
sion, provided that the industrial commission shall make such records avail-
able:
(a) To the parties in any worker's compensation claim and to the indus-
trial special indemnity fund of the state of Idaho; or
(b) To employers and prospective employers subject to the provisions of
the Americans with disabilities act, 42 U.S.C. 12112, or other statu-
tory limitations, who certify that the information is being requested
with respect to a worker to whom the employer has extended an offer of
employment and will be used in accordance with the provisions of the
Americans with disabilities act, 42 U.S.C. 12112, or other statutory
limitations; or
(c) To employers and prospective employers not subject to the provi-
sions of the Americans with disabilities act, 42 U.S.C. 12112, or other
statutory limitations, provided the employer presents a written autho-
rization from the person to whom the records pertain; or
(d) To others who demonstrate that the public interest in allowing in-
spection and copying of such records outweighs the public or private in-
terest in maintaining the confidentiality of such records, as deter-
mined by a civil court of competent jurisdiction; or
(e) Although a claimant's records maintained by the industrial commis-
sion, including medical and rehabilitation records, are otherwise ex-
empt from public disclosure, the quoting or discussing of medical or re-
habilitation records contained in the industrial commission's records
during a hearing for compensation or in a written decision issued by the
industrial commission shall be permitted; provided further, the true
identification of the parties shall not be exempt from public disclo-
sure in any written decision issued and released to the public by the in-
dustrial commission.
(11) Records of investigations compiled by the commission on aging in-
volving vulnerable adults as defined in section 18-1505, Idaho Code, alleged
to be abused, neglected or exploited.
(12) Criminal history records and fingerprints as defined in section
67-3001, Idaho Code, and compiled by the Idaho state police. Such records
shall be released only in accordance with chapter 30, title 67, Idaho Code.


(13) Records furnished or obtained pursuant to section 41-1019, Idaho
Code, regarding termination of an appointment, employment, contract or
other insurance business relationship between an insurer and a producer.
(14) Records of a prisoner or former prisoner in the custody of any state
or local correctional facility, when the request is made by another prisoner
in the custody of any state or local correctional facility.
(15) Except as provided in section 72-1007, Idaho Code, records of the
Idaho industrial commission relating to compensation for crime victims pur-
suant to chapter 10, title 72, Idaho Code.
(16) Records or information identifying a complainant maintained by the
department of health and welfare pursuant to section 39-3556, Idaho Code,
relating to certified family homes, unless the complainant consents in writ-
ing to the disclosure or the disclosure of the complainant's identity is re-
quired in any administrative or judicial proceeding.
(17) Records of any certification or notification required by federal
law to be made in connection with the acquisition or transfer of a firearm,
including a firearm as defined in 26 U.S.C. 5845(a).
(18) Records of the office of the state public defender and the office of
the state appellate public defender containing information protected or ex-
empted from disclosure under the rules adopted by the Idaho supreme court,
attorney work product, attorney-client privileged communication, records
containing confidential information from an individual about his criminal
case or performance of his attorney, or confidential information about an
inquiry into an attorney's fitness to represent indigent defendants.
(19) Records and information received by the office of the state con-
troller from any local government, state agency and department, or volunteer
nongovernmental entity for purposes of entry into the criminal justice
integrated data system pursuant to section 19-4803, Idaho Code, and all
records created by persons authorized to research and analyze information
entered into the criminal justice integrated data system, regardless of
whether such records were previously exempted from disclosure or redacted
pursuant to state or federal law or court order. This exemption does not
apply to projects, reports, and data analyses approved for release by the
data oversight council and issued by persons authorized to conduct research
and analysis as set forth in chapter 48, title 19, Idaho Code. Records and
information relating to the management of the criminal justice integrated
data system shall not be exempt from disclosure except as otherwise provided
in law.
(20) Records that contain any identifying information or any informa-
tion that could lead to the identification of any persons or entities that
participate in or assist with an execution of a death sentence as described
in section 19-2716A, Idaho Code.
(21) Records, other than public expenditure records, relating to
the nature, location, or function of cybersecurity devices, programs, or
systems designed to protect computer, information technology, or communica-
tions systems against terrorist or other attacks.
(22) Any index, report, or records of any person arrested for, prose-
cuted for, or convicted of a crime in this state who has successfully peti-
tioned a court to have his records shielded from disclosure pursuant to sec-
tion 67-3004(11), Idaho Code.


(23) Any record of an unlawful detainer under section 6-303, Idaho Code,
if shielded by the court pursuant to section 6-303A, Idaho Code.
(24) Any photographs or images of a decedent taken as part of a coroner
death investigation or law enforcement investigation regardless of whether
such investigation is active or not; however, such photographs or images may
be disclosed upon request to a decedent's next of kin once the coroner death
investigation, law enforcement investigation, and criminal case, including
all appeals and all civil proceedings related to the criminal case, are no
longer active. As used in this subsection, "next of kin" means the closest
living relative in the order of spouse, adult children, parents, siblings,
and grandparents.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.